Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4929.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16201. (1) A licensee or registrant shall renew the license or registration on or before the expiration date as prescribed by rule. The department shall mail a notice to the licensee or registrant at the last known address on file with a board, the department, or may send the notice by electronic mail to a licensee or registrant described in section 16192(4), advising of the time, procedure, and fee for renewal. Failure of the licensee or registrant to receive notice under this subsection does not relieve the licensee or registrant of the responsibility for renewing his or her the license or registration. (2) A license or registration not renewed by the expiration date may be renewed within 60 days after the expiration date on application, payment of renewal and late renewal fees, and fulfillment of any continued competency or continuing education requirements set forth in this article or rules promulgated under this article. The licensee or registrant may continue to practice and use the title during the 60-day time period. (3) If a license or registration is not renewed within 60 days after the expiration date under subsection (2), the license or registration is considered null and void. The licensee shall not practice or use the title and a registrant shall not use the title. Except as otherwise provided in this article or by rule, an individual may be relicensed or reregistered within 3 years after the expiration date on application, payment of the application processing, renewal, and late renewal fees, and fulfillment of any continued competency or continuing education requirements in effect on the expiration date, or that would have been required had the individual renewed his or her the individual's license or registration under subsection (1). A temporary license or registration may be issued under section 16181 pending the results of action taken under this subsection. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this article or by rule, an individual may be relicensed or reregistered more than 3 years after the expiration date on application as a new applicant, meeting all licensure or registration requirements in effect at the time of application, taking or retaking and passing any examinations required for initial licensure or registration, and payment of paying fees required of new applicants. (5) The expiration of a license or registration or the surrender of a license or registration under section 16202 does not terminate the board's authority to impose sanctions on the licensee or registrant whose license or registration has expired or been surrendered. Sec. 16202. (1) A licensee or registrant may submit a request to voluntarily surrender the licensee's or registrant's license or registration by delivering the certificate of licensure or certificate of registration to the director with a written notice, on a form prescribed by the department, stating the licensee's or registrant's intent to surrender the license or registration. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the department shall consider a license or registration surrendered beginning on the date the department receives the form under subsection (1). The department shall deny a request to voluntarily surrender a license or registration under this section if any of the following apply: (a) The department determines that the licensee or registrant is surrendering the license or registration in an attempt to avoid disciplinary action. (b) The department has received an allegation against the licensee or registrant under section 16231. (3) The surrender of a license or registration under this section does not affect the licensee's or registrant's civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender of the license or registration. (4) If a license or registration is surrendered under this section before its expiration date, the department shall not refund any fees paid to the department. (5) A licensee or registrant who surrenders a license or registration under this section may, beginning 8 years after the date the license or registration is surrendered, apply for a license or registration for the same health profession in the same manner as an applicant for relicensure or reregistration under section 16201(4). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.